Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB113.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 8-254 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-254.
(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b), the division shall revoke a
person's driving privileges upon receiving a record of the person's
conviction of any of the following offenses, including municipal
violations, when the conviction has become final, or upon receiving a
record of a person's adjudication as a juvenile offender for commission of
an act which, if committed by a person 18 or more years of age, would
constitute any of the following offenses when the adjudication has become
final:
(1) Involuntary manslaughter, as defined in subsection (a)(2) of
K.S.A. 21-5405, and amendments thereto, if the crime is committed while
committing a violation of K.S.A. 8-1566 or subsection (a) of 8-1568, and
amendments thereto, or the ordinance of a city or resolution of a county
which prohibits any acts prohibited by those statutes;
(2) vehicular homicide, as defined in K.S.A. 21-5406, and
amendments thereto;
(3) battery, as defined in subsection (a)(1) of K.S.A. 21-5413, and
amendments thereto, if the crime is committed while committing a
violation of K.S.A. 8-1566 or 8-1568, and amendments thereto, or the
ordinance of a city or resolution of a county which prohibits the acts
prohibited by those statutes;
(4) failure to stop and render aid as required under the laws of this
state in the event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death or
personal injury of another;
(5) conviction, or forfeiture of bail not vacated, upon a charge of
reckless driving, except violations committed under K.S.A. 8-1566(a)(2),
and amendment thereto, shall not apply under this paragraph;
(6) conviction, or forfeiture of bail not vacated of for any felony in
the commission of which a motor vehicle is used; or

SB 113 2
(7) fleeing or attempting to elude a police officer as provided in
K.S.A. 8-1568, and amendments thereto, or conviction of violation of an
ordinance of any city or a law of another state which is in substantial
conformity with such statute.
(b) In lieu of revoking a person's driving privileges as provided by
subsection (a), the court in which the person is convicted or adjudicated
may place restrictions on the person's driving privileges as provided by
K.S.A. 8-292, and amendments thereto, unless the violation was
committed while operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in
K.S.A. 8-2,128. Driving privileges are to be automatically revoked if the
violation which leads to the subsequent conviction occurs in a commercial
motor vehicle, as defined in K.S.A. 8-2,128.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 8-1566 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-1566.
(a) Any person who drives any shall be guilty of reckless driving if such
person operates a vehicle:
(1) in willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property
is guilty of reckless driving; or
(2) at a speed of 100 miles per hour or more or 35 miles per hour or
more over the maximum posted speed limit, except as provided in K.S.A. 8-
1506, and amendments thereto, without regard to any culpable mental
state.
(b) Except as provided in K.S.A. 8-2,142, and amendments thereto,
violation of this section is a misdemeanor. Upon a first conviction of a
violation of this section, a person shall be sentenced to not less than five
days nor more than 90 days imprisonment or fined not less than $25 nor
more than $500, or both such fine and imprisonment. On a second or
subsequent conviction of a violation of this section, a person shall be
sentenced to not less than 10 days nor more than six months imprisonment,
or fined not less than $50 nor more than $500 or both such fine and
imprisonment.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 8-254 and 8-1566 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.